Hawaii statutes.
[§353G-10] Drug testing or assessment fees.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the agency responsible for
monitoring a person's compliance with the terms and conditions of parole or
other release from a correctional center or facility shall impose upon the
person reasonable fees to cover the cost of:

(1) Any drug test of the person required or ordered
under this chapter; and

(2) Any assessment of the person required or ordered
under this chapter.

The fees shall not be less than the actual and administrative
costs of a drug test or assessment. The fees may be deducted from any income a
person has received as a result of labor performed in a correctional center or
facility or any type of work release program.

(b) Upon a finding of indigence, the agency
responsible for monitoring a person's compliance with the terms and conditions
of parole or other release from a correctional center or facility shall require
the person to pay as much of the fee as is consistent with the person's ability
to pay.

(c) All fees collected pursuant to subsection
(a)(1) shall be forwarded to the agency responsible for monitoring the person's
compliance with the terms and conditions of parole or other release from a
correctional center or facility for payment of costs associated with the
agency's drug testing program.

(d) All fees collected pursuant to subsection
(a)(2) shall be forwarded to the assessment program for payment of costs
associated with the provision of assessments. [L 1998, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next